District of Columbia statutes.
31-2953

Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to all individual and group health benefits plans issued or renewed on or after 120 days after March 25, 2003.

Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-233, § 4, 49 DCR 9772